Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1007
Nebraska Safety Center; agencies involved in activities relating to safety; cooperation.

Whenever requested or deemed appropriate by the Nebraska Safety Center, the University of Nebraska, the community colleges, the State Department of Education, the Safety Council of Nebraska, Inc., the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, any agency providing services through city or local governments, and any other agency involved in activities related to safety shall cooperate with and offer expertise to the center to assist it in carrying out its purposes and functions under section 85-1006. It is not the intent of the Legislature to duplicate existing programs but to provide extensions of those programs when deemed necessary by the center and the organizations currently conducting the activity.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 123.